Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5935.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11b. (1) Both of the following apply to an application for a building permit or an additional permit that an applicant submits to the department: (a) If the department denies the application for a building permit or an additional permit, the department must notify the applicant of the basis for the denial. The notice must include a citation to the provision of this act, the code, or the requirements of other applicable laws and ordinances on which the denial is based. (b) If the department determines that the application for a building permit or an additional permit is not a complete application, the department must notify the applicant in writing or make the information electronically available to the applicant not later than 7 days after receipt of the application. If the department fails to notify or make the information electronically available to the applicant within the 7-day time period, the application for a building permit or an additional permit is considered to be a complete application. (2) As used in this section, "complete application" means an application complete on its face that is submitted with any applicable permit fees as well as any other information, records, approval, security, or similar item required by law or rule from a local unit of government, federal agency, or private entity but not from another department or agency of this state. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5932. (b) House Bill No. 5933. (c) House Bill No. 5934.